Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.100

Chapter not applicable to retail installment transactions.

This chapter shall not apply to a retail installment transaction, as defined by RCW 63.14.010, whether or not it is construed to be a loan or forbearance of any money, goods, or things in action.

[ 1981 c 78 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 78: See note following RCW 19.52.020.